District of Columbia statutes.
18-111

Withholding will.

Whoever, having possession of a testamentary instrument, willfully neglects, for the period of 90 days after the death of the testator becomes known to him, to deliver it to the Probate Court, or to the Register of Wills, or to an executor named in the instrument, shall be fined not more than $500.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 687, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

History

This section is referenced in § 6-1071, § 47-368.06, and § 50-2303.04a.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 18-111.
1973 Ed., § 18-111.

Prior Codifications